North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-05 Claims and Compensation

65-05-01.
Claims for benefits — When and where filed.

All original claims for benefits must be filed by the injured employee, or someone on the injured employee’s behalf, within one year after the injury or within two years after the death. The date of injury for purposes of this section is the first date that a reasonable person knew or should have known that the employee suffered a work-related injury and has either lost wages because of a resulting disability or received medical treatment. Notwithstanding a statute of limitations assertion, the claimant bears the burden of proving any entitlement to benefits. If the organization is estopped from applying the statute of limitations in this section because an employer’s willful conduct prevented an injured employee from filing a claim in a timely manner, that employer shall reimburse the organization for the full amount of all benefits paid during the first five years of that claim. Benefits may not be allowed under this title to any person, except as provided in section 65-05-04, unless that person, or someone on that person’s behalf, files a written claim for benefits within the time specified in this section. A claim must be filed by:

Delivering it at the office of the organization or to any person the organization designates by rule; or

Depositing it in the mail properly stamped and addressed to the organization or to any person the organization designates by rule.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 15; 1925 Supp., § 396a15; S.L. 1941, ch. 305, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 65-0501; S.L. 1967, ch. 484, § 1; 1977, ch. 579, § 8; 1979, ch. 652, § 1; 1989, ch. 766, § 2; 1993, ch. 620, § 3; 1997, ch. 539, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-01.1.
Pneumoconiosis claims — Rules — Agreements.

The organization shall provide such additional coverage, allow such additional time for claims to be filed, and pay such additional compensation and other benefits in excess of the coverage, filing time, and benefits otherwise provided in this title, as may be required by the Federal Coal Mine Health and Safety Act of 1969 and amendments thereto, for any coal miner, coal miner’s surviving spouse, or dependents who, due to the disability or death of such coal miner as the result of pneumoconiosis, would be entitled to claim benefits under such federal Act; provided, however, that such claim is first filed with the federal agency designated in the federal Act and adjudicated and found compensable by them; and provided that such pneumoconiosis was contracted or aggravated as the result of employment as a coal miner in the state of North Dakota. The organization shall adopt such reasonable rules and enter into such agreements necessary to comply with section 421 of said federal Act.

Source:

S.L. 1983, ch. 699, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-01.2.
Notice to employer.

When an employee is involved in an accident while on the job, the employee shall take steps immediately to notify the employer that the accident occurred and what is the general nature of the injury to the employee, if apparent. Notice may be either oral or written. The notice must be given to the employee’s immediate supervisor or another supervisor authorized to receive notice. Absent good cause, notice may not be given later than seven days after the accident occurred or the general nature of the employee’s injury became apparent.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 622, § 1.

65-05-01.3.
Failure to comply with notice and filing provisions.

If an employee fails to notify the employer of an accident and the general nature of the employee’s injury, the organization may consider that failure to notify in determining whether the employee’s injury is compensable.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 622, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-01.4.
Employer to file first report of notice of injury.

The employer shall file a first report of notice of injury with the organization within seven days from the date the employer receives the notice of injury from the employee. Failure of the employer to file a first report of notice of injury is an admission by the employer that the alleged injury may be compensable. The organization may make or reopen a determination made without an employer’s first report of notice of injury on its own motion pursuant to section 65-05-04 on the grounds determined by the organization to be sufficient.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 622, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-01.5.
Organization to notify employee of receipt of employer’s first report of notice of injury.

If a claim for compensation has not been received by the organization but the organization has received an employer’s first report of notice of injury, the organization shall notify the employee that the employer’s first report has been received and shall advise the employee of the claim filing requirements of section 65-05-01.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 622, § 4; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-02.
Form in which claim must be filed.

Every claim must be made on forms to be furnished by the organization and must contain all the information required by it. Each claim must be signed by the person entitled to compensation or by the person acting on that person’s behalf and, except in case of death, must be accompanied by a certificate of the employee’s doctor stating that the employee was physically examined, stating the nature of the injury and the nature and probable extent of the disability. For any reasonable cause shown, the organization may waive the provisions of this section.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 15; 1925 Supp., § 396a15; S.L. 1941, ch. 305, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 65-0502; S.L. 1947, ch. 375, § 4; 1957 Supp., § 65-0502; S.L. 1977, ch. 579, § 9; 1989, ch. 765, § 2; 1989, ch. 766, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-03.
Jurisdiction of organization to hear questions within its jurisdiction — Finality of determination.

The organization shall have full power and authority to hear and determine all questions within its jurisdiction, and its decisions, except as provided in chapter 65-10, are final and are entitled to the same faith and credit as a judgment of a court of record.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 17; 1925 Supp., § 396a17; S.L. 1935, ch. 286, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 65-0503; S.L. 1947, ch. 377, § 1; 1949, ch. 354, § 5; 1951, ch. 342, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 65-0503; S.L. 1981, ch. 643, § 2; 1989, ch. 765, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-04.
Organization has continuing jurisdiction over claims properly filed.

If the original claim for compensation has been made within the time specified in section 65-05-01, the organization at any time, on its own motion or on application, may review the award, and in accordance with the facts found on such review, may end, diminish, or increase the compensation previously awarded, or, if compensation has been refused or discontinued, may award compensation. There is no appeal from an organization decision not to reopen a claim after the organization’s order on the claim has become final.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 18; 1925 Supp., § 396a18; R.C. 1943, § 65-0504; S.L. 1981, ch. 643, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-05.
Payments made to insured employees injured in course of employment and to their dependents.

The organization shall disburse the fund for the payment of compensation and other benefits as provided in this chapter to employees, or to their dependents in case death has ensued, who:

Are subject to the provisions of this title;

Are employed by employers who are subject to this title; and

Have been injured in the course of their employment.

If an employee, or any person seeking benefits because of the death of an employee, applies for benefits from another state for the same injury, the organization will suspend all future benefits pending resolution of the application. If an employee, or any person seeking benefits because of the death of an employee, is determined to be eligible for benefits through some other state act or enters an agreement to resolve a claim through some other state act, no further compensation may be allowed under this title and the employee, or any person seeking benefits because of the death of an employee, must reimburse the organization for the entire amount of benefits paid.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, §§ 3, 10; 1921, ch. 141, § 1; 1923, ch. 350, § 1; 1925, ch. 223, § 1; 1925 Supp., §§ 396a3, 396a10; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1; 1929, ch. 260, § 1; 1931, ch. 313, §§ 1, 2; 1935, ch. 286, § 4; 1941, ch. 303, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 65-0505; S.L. 1955, ch. 354, § 10; 1957 Supp., § 65-0505; S.L. 1973, ch. 504, § 1; 1981, ch. 643, § 4; 1983, ch. 699, § 3; 1993, ch. 626, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 602, § 2; 2013, ch. 499, § 4.

Note.

Section 18 of chapter 499, S.L. 2013 provides:

“APPLICATION.

Sections 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, and 17 apply to all claims regardless of date of injury. Section 6 applies to permanent impairment evaluations performed on or after August 1, 2011.”

65-05-06.
Payment of compensation in lieu of claim for relief against employer.

The payment of compensation or other benefits by the organization to an injured employee, or to the injured employee’s dependents in case death has ensued, are in lieu of any and all claims for relief whatsoever against the employer of the injured or deceased employee.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 10; 1923, ch. 350, § 1; 1925 Supp., § 396a10; S.L. 1931, ch. 313, § 1; 1935, ch. 286, § 4; 1941, ch. 303, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 65-0506; S.L. 1985, ch. 82, § 161; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-07.
Injured employee given medical and hospital service required — Furnished artificial limbs and appliances for rehabilitation — Fee approval.

The fund shall furnish to an injured employee reasonable and appropriate medical, surgical, and hospital service and supplies necessary to treat a compensable injury. The fund may furnish artificial members and replacements the organization determines necessary to rehabilitate an injured employee.

The allied health care professional must be acting within the scope of the allied health care professional’s license or fees will be denied.

Fees may not be approved for more than one allied health care professional in a case in which treatment is provided over the same period of time except for the services of a consulting doctor, assistant surgeon, or anesthetist or in an emergency.

The organization, in cooperation with professional organizations of allied health care professionals, shall establish a system of peer review to determine reasonableness of fees and payment denials for unjustified treatments, hospitalization, or visits. The allied health care professional may appeal adverse decisions of the organization in accordance with the medical aid rules adopted by the organization.

An allied health care professional may not bill an injured employee for a service rendered as a result of the compensable work injury.

Under this section, the organization may modify real estate and may provide for adaptations and modifications to motor vehicles as follows:

In the case of an injured employee who sustained a catastrophic injury, as defined in chapter 65-05.1, the organization may pay an amount not to exceed seventy-five thousand dollars to provide permanent additions, remodeling, or adaptations to real estate it determines necessary. The dollar limit is for the life of the injured employee, regardless of any subsequent claim. This subdivision does not allow the organization to purchase any real estate.

In the case of an injured employee who sustained a catastrophic injury, as defined in chapter 65-05.1, the organization may pay an amount not to exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars to provide the most cost-effective, specially equipped motor vehicle or vehicle adaptations the organization determines medically necessary. The organization may establish factors to be used in determining whether a specially equipped motor vehicle or adaptation is necessary. Under this subdivision, the organization may not pay for insurance of or maintenance of the motor vehicle. Within the dollar limit and under this subdivision, the organization may pay for vehicle or adaptation replacement purchases. The dollar limit is for the life of the injured employee, regardless of any subsequent claim.

In the case of an injured employee who has not sustained a catastrophic injury, as defined in chapter 65-05.1, the organization may provide the benefits under subdivisions a and b if the organization determines the benefits would be cost-effective and appropriate because of exceptional circumstances as determined by the organization.

If an allied health care professional who has treated or provided services to an injured employee fails or refuses without just cause to file with the organization a report required by section 65-05-02, 65-05-08, or 65-05-08.1, within thirty days of examination, treatment, or provision of other services rendered in connection with a compensable work injury, or within thirty days of a request for the report made by the claimant, the claimant’s representative, or the organization, the organization shall assess as a penalty a sum of one hundred dollars. Health care providers and allied health care professionals may not bill an injured worker for a penalty assessed by the organization under this subsection.

The filing of an accident report or the rendering of treatment to an injured worker who comes under the organization’s jurisdiction constitutes acceptance of the organization’s medical aid rules and compliance with the organization’s rules and fees.

The organization may not pay for:

Personal items for the injured employee’s personal use or hygiene, including toothbrushes, slippers, shampoo, and soap.

A product or item including clothing or footwear unless the items are considered orthopedic devices and are prescribed by the treating allied health care professional.

Furniture except hospital beds, shower stools, wheelchairs, or whirlpools if prescribed by the treating allied health care professional.

Vitamins and food supplements except in those cases in which the injury causes severe dietary problems, the injury results in the employee’s paraplegia or quadriplegia, or the employee becomes wheelchair-bound due to the injury.

Eye examinations unless there is a reasonable potential for injury to the employee’s eyes as a result of the injury.

Private hospital or nursing home rooms except in cases of extreme medical necessity and only when directed by the attending doctor. If the employee desires better accommodations than those ordered by the attending doctor, the employee will pay the difference in cost.

Serological tests, including VDRL and RPR, or other tests for venereal disease or pregnancy, or any other routine tests unless clearly necessitated by the injury.

Aids or programs primarily intended to help the employee lose weight or stop smoking unless ordered by the organization.

Home gymnasium or exercise equipment unless ordered by the organization.

Memberships or monthly dues to health clubs, unless ordered by the organization.

Massage, unless ordered by the organization.

Medical marijuana.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. A; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. A; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. A; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. A; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. A; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. A; 1939, ch. 251, § 1, subs. A; 1943, ch. 274, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 65-0507; S.L. 1967, ch. 484, § 2; 1975, ch. 584, § 8; 1981, ch. 640, § 2; 1989, ch. 769, § 1; 1991, ch. 714, § 42; 1997, ch. 540, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 562, § 5; 2007, ch. 570, § 1; 2007, ch. 571, § 1; 2011, ch. 509, § 1; 2011, ch. 512, § 3; 2013, ch. 503, § 1; 2017, ch. 434, § 2, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 523, § 7, effective August 1, 2019.

65-05-07.1.
Organization to adopt fee schedule. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 554, § 4.

65-05-07.2.
Payment to organization for certain claims. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 714, § 41; 1995, ch. 618, § 2; 1997, ch. 541, § 1; 2001, ch. 583, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 564, § 8; 2005, ch. 604, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 437, § 6, effective August 1, 2017.

65-05-07.3.
Medical bills — Electronic acceptance.

The organization shall establish guidelines, systems, and procedures for the acceptance of medical bills and supporting documentation by electronic methods. Health care providers shall submit medical bills and supporting documentation to the organization by this electronic method no later than July 1, 2021.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 525, § 5, effective July 1, 2019.

65-05-08.
Disability benefits — Not paid unless period of disability is of five days’ duration or more — Application required — Suspended during confinement — Duty to report wages.

Benefits may not be paid for disability, the duration of which is less than five consecutive calendar days. An employer may not require an employee to use sick leave or annual leave, or other employer-paid time off work, before applying for benefits under this section, in lieu of receiving benefits under this section, or in conjunction with benefits provided under this section, but may allow an employee to use sick leave or annual leave to make up the difference between the employee’s wage-loss benefits and the employee’s regular pay. If the period of disability is five consecutive calendar days’ duration or longer, benefits must be paid for the period of disability provided that:

When disability benefits are discontinued, the organization may not begin payment again unless the injured employee files a reapplication for disability benefits on a form supplied by the organization. In case of reapplication, the award may commence no more than thirty days before the date of reapplication. Disability benefits must be reinstated upon proof by the injured employee that:

The employee has sustained a significant change in the compensable medical condition;

The employee has sustained an actual wage loss caused by the significant change in the compensable medical condition; and

The employee has not retired or voluntarily withdrawn from the job market as defined in section 65-05-09.3.

Payments of disability and rehabilitation benefits of an employee who is eligible for, or receiving, benefits under this title must be suspended when the employee is confined in a penitentiary, jail, youth correctional facility, or any other penal institution for a period of between seventy-two consecutive hours and one hundred eighty consecutive days. Payments of disability and rehabilitation benefits of an employee who is eligible for, or receiving, benefits under this title must be discontinued when the employee is confined in a penitentiary, jail, youth correctional facility, or any other penal institution for a period in excess of one hundred eighty consecutive days.

An employee who is eligible for, or receiving disability or rehabilitation benefits under this title shall report any wages earned, from part-time or full-time work from any source. If an employee fails to report wages earned, the employee shall refund to the organization all disability or vocational rehabilitation benefits overpaid by the organization for that time period. To facilitate recovery of those benefits, the organization may offset future benefits payable, under section 65-05-29. If the employee willfully fails to report wages earned, the employee is subject to the penalties in section 65-05-33. An employee shall report whether the employee has performed work or received wages. The organization periodically shall provide a form to all injured employees receiving disability or rehabilitation benefits which the injured employee must complete to retain eligibility for further disability or rehabilitation benefits, regardless of the date of injury or claim filing. The form will advise the injured employee of the possible penalties for failure to report any work or activities as required by this section. An injured employee who is receiving disability or vocational rehabilitation benefits must report any work activities to the organization whether or not the injured employee receives any wages. An injured employee who is receiving disability or vocational rehabilitation benefits must also report any other activity if the injured employee receives any money, including prize winnings, from undertaking that activity, regardless of expenses or whether there is a net profit. For purposes of this subsection, “work” does not include routine daily activities of self-care or family care, or routine maintenance of the home and yard, and “activities” does not include recreational gaming or passive investment endeavors.

An employee shall request disability benefits on a claim form furnished by the organization. Disability benefits may not commence more than one year prior to the date of filing of the initial claim for disability benefits.

The provisions of this section apply to any disability claim asserted against the fund on or after July 1, 1991, irrespective of injury date.

It is the burden of the employee to show that the inability to obtain employment or to earn as much as the employee earned at the time of injury is due to physical limitation related to the injury, and that any wage loss claimed is the result of the compensable injury.

If the employee voluntarily limits income or refuses to accept employment suitable to the employee’s capacity, offered to or procured for the employee, the employee is not entitled to disability or vocational rehabilitation benefits during the limitation of income or refusal to accept employment unless the organization determines the limitation or refusal is justified. To receive additional disability or vocational rehabilitation benefits following an unjustified limitation or refusal, the employee shall meet the requirements of a reapplication for benefits as outlined in this section.

The organization may not pay disability benefits unless the loss of earning capacity exceeds ten percent. The injured employee may earn up to ten percent of the employee’s preinjury average gross weekly earnings with no reduction in total disability benefits. The employee must report any earnings to the organization for a determination of whether the employee is within the limit set in this subsection.

Upon securing suitable employment, the injured employee shall notify the organization of the name and address of the employer, the date the employment began, and the amount of wages being received. If the injured employee is receiving disability benefits, the injured employee shall notify the organization whenever there is a change in work status or wages received.

The organization shall pay to an employee receiving disability benefits a dependency allowance for each child of the employee at the rate of fifteen dollars per week per child.

Dependency allowance for the children may be made directly to either parent or guardian at the discretion of the organization.

The organization may not pay wage loss benefits if the wage loss is related to the use or presence of medical marijuana.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. B; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. B; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. B; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. B; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. B; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. B; R.C. 1943, § 65-0508; S.L. 1947, ch. 375, § 5; 1957 Supp., § 65-0508; S.L. 1967, ch. 484, § 3; 1989, ch. 770, § 1; 1991, ch. 714, § 43; 1997, ch. 542, § 1; 1999, ch. 556, § 1; 2001, ch. 575, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 619, § 1; 2013, ch. 499, § 5; 2017, ch. 434, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 500, § 5, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 13 of chapter 500, S.L. 2021, provides in part, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to all claims regardless of date of injury.”

65-05-08.1.
Verification of disability.

An injured employee’s health care provider shall certify the period of disability and the extent of the injured worker’s abilities and restrictions.

A health care provider certifying disability shall include in the report filed with the organization:

The medical basis established by medical evidence supported by objective medical findings for the certification of disability;

Whether the employee is totally disabled, or, if the employee is not totally disabled, whether the employee is able to return to any employment, and a statement of the employee’s restrictions and physical limitations; and

A professional opinion as to the expected length of, and reason for, the disability.

A health care provider may not certify or verify past disability commencing more than sixty days before the health care provider’s examination of the employee.

The report must be filed on a form furnished by the organization, or on any other form acceptable to the organization.

The injured employee shall ensure the required reports for any period of disability are filed.

Prior to the expiration of a period of disability certified by a health care provider, if a report certifying an additional period of disability has not been filed, or upon receipt of a report or other evidence indicating an injured employee who is receiving disability benefits has been or will be released to return to work, the organization shall send a notice to that employee of the organization’s intention to discontinue benefits, including an explanation of the reason for discontinuing benefits, an explanation of the injured employee’s right to respond, and the procedure for filing the required report or challenging the proposed action. Thereafter, if the required certification is not filed, the organization shall discontinue disability benefits, effective twenty-one days after the date the notice of intention to discontinue benefits is mailed or the date on which the injured employee actually returned to work, whichever occurs first.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 714, § 44; 1993, ch. 614, § 9; 1993, ch. 627, § 1; 1997, ch. 542, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2017, ch. 439, § 1, effective August 1, 2017; 2019, ch. 523, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

65-05-08.2.
Preacceptance disability benefits.

If, after receiving a claim for benefits, the organization determines that more information is needed to process the claim, but that the information in the file indicates the injured employee is more likely than not entitled to disability benefits, the organization may pay preacceptance disability benefits equal to the weekly disability benefit allowed under section 65-05-09. The organization may continue to pay preacceptance disability benefits to the employee during the period the claim is pending, unless the injured employee is not cooperating with requests from the organization for additional information needed to process the claim. The organization may not pay more than sixty days of preacceptance benefits. The organization may only recover a payment made to an injured employee under this section if that recovery is allowed under section 65-05-33. There is no appeal from an organization decision not to pay preacceptance disability benefits.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 542, § 4; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 482, § 98; 2009, ch. 619, § 2.

65-05-08.3.
Treating health care provider’s opinion.

A presumption may not be established in favor of any health care provider’s opinion. The organization shall resolve conflicting medical opinions and in doing so the organization shall consider the following factors:

The length of the treatment relationship and the frequency of examinations;

The nature and extent of the treatment relationship;

The amount of relevant evidence in support of the opinion;

How consistent the opinion is with the record as a whole;

Appearance of bias;

Whether the health care provider specializes in the medical issues related to the opinion; and

Other relevant factors.

This section does not apply to managed care programs under section 65-02-20. For purposes of this section, the organization shall determine whether a health care provider is an injured employee’s treating health care provider.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 620, § 1; 2013, ch. 504, § 1; 2019, ch. 523, § 9, effective August 1, 2019.

65-05-09.
Temporary total or permanent total disability — Weekly and aggregate benefit.

If an injury causes temporary total or permanent total disability, the fund shall pay to the injured employee during that disability a weekly benefit equal to sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the gross average weekly wage of the injured employee, subject to a minimum of sixty percent and a maximum of one hundred twenty-five percent of the average weekly wage in the state. If an injured employee is disabled due to an injury, that injured employee’s benefits will be based upon the injured employee’s wage and the organization benefit rates in effect on the date of first disability.

Unless otherwise provided in this subsection, if an injured employee suffers disability but is able to return to employment for a period of three consecutive calendar months or more, that injured employee’s benefits will be based upon the wage received at the time of the recurrence of the disability. If the wage received at the time of the recurrence of the disability is lower than the injured employee’s average weekly wage and the lower wage is due to the physical limitations of the compensable injury, the injured employee’s benefits must be based upon the injured employee’s average weekly wage. It is the burden of the injured employee to show the inability to earn as much as the injured employee’s average weekly wage is due to the physical limitation related to the injury. The organization benefit rates are those in effect at the time of that recurrence.

The disability benefit or the combined disability benefit and dependency award may not exceed the weekly wage of the injured employee after deductions for social security and federal income tax.

When an injured employee is permanently and totally disabled, must be maintained in a nursing home or similar facility, and has no dependent parent, spouse, or children, as much of that injured employee’s weekly benefit as is necessary may be used by the organization to help defray the cost of the nursing home care.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. C; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. C; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. C; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. C; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. C; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. C; 1935, ch. 286, § 2, subs. C; 1941, ch. 305, § 2, subs. C; 1943, ch. 274, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 65-0509; S.L. 1945, ch. 337, § 2; 1947, ch. 375, § 6; 1949, ch. 354, § 6; 1951, ch. 344, § 5; 1953, ch. 353, § 2; 1957 Supp., § 65-0509; S.L. 1959, ch. 421, § 1; 1961, ch. 390, § 1; 1963, ch. 427, § 1; 1965, ch. 456, § 1; 1967, ch. 485, § 1; 1969, ch. 558, § 3; 1973, ch. 505, § 1; 1975, ch. 579, § 3; 1977, ch. 579, § 10; 1979, ch. 187, § 102; 1985, ch. 685, § 3; 1987, ch. 753, § 1; 1989, ch. 770, § 2; 1991, ch. 714, § 45; 1997, ch. 542, § 3; 1999, ch. 556, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 619, § 3, 2009, ch. 621, § 1; 2019, ch. 525, § 6, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 500, § 6, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 13 of chapter 500, S.L. 2021, provides in part, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to all claims regardless of date of injury.”

65-05-09.1.
Social security offset.

When an injured employee, or spouse or dependent of an injured employee, is eligible for and is receiving permanent total or temporary total disability benefits under section 65-05-09, and is also eligible for, is receiving, or will receive, benefits under title II of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 423], the aggregate benefits payable under section 65-05-09 must be reduced, but not below zero, by an amount equal as nearly as practicable to one-half of such federal benefit. The federal benefit, or primary insurance amount, must be determined by the social security administration. The amount to be offset must equal the primary insurance amount rounded to the next lowest dollar less credit for either the entire amount of attorney’s fees and costs, or the fees and costs paid to an authorized representative of the employee as allowed by the social security administration, withheld from past-due social security benefits or paid directly by the claimant for representation before the social security administration. The amount of the offset computed by the organization initially must remain the same throughout the period of eligibility and may not be affected by any increase or decrease in federal benefits.

Any injured employee, or dependent of an injured employee, receiving permanent total or temporary total disability benefits under section 65-05-09 and whose benefits are offset as provided herein, is not eligible for any escalation of benefits which would adversely affect the organization’s right to offset workforce safety and insurance benefits against social security benefits, as provided for in this chapter. This offset will become effective on January 1, 1980, provided that it meets the criteria necessary to allow states to offset federal benefits under title II of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 424a]. Providing further that:

If the receipt of social security benefits results in an overpayment of temporary or permanent total disability benefits by the organization, a refund of any overpayment must be made by the injured employee or that overpayment must be taken from future disability benefits, permanent partial impairment awards, or personal reimbursements on the current claim or any future claim filed, at a recovery rate to be determined by the organization.

If a claim has been accepted on an aggravation basis and the injured worker is eligible for social security benefits, the organization’s offset must be proportionally calculated.

If any person described in this section refuses to authorize the release of information concerning the amount of benefits payable under the Social Security Act, the organization’s estimate of the amount is deemed to be correct until the actual amount is established and no adjustment may be made for any period of time covered by the refusal.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 654, § 1; 1985, ch. 688, § 1; 1989, ch. 69, § 82; 1989, ch. 766, § 4; 1993, ch. 628, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2017, ch. 439, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

65-05-09.2.
Retirement offset.

If an employee is entitled to permanent total disability benefits and social security retirement benefits under 42 U.S.C. sections 402 and 405, the aggregate wage-loss benefits payable under this title must be determined in accordance with this section. The employee’s social security retirement offset must equal forty percent of the calculated ratio of the employee’s average weekly wages, as calculated on the commencement of the first, or recurrent, disability under section 65-05-09, to the current state’s average weekly wage. Any offset calculated cannot exceed forty percent of the employee’s weekly social security retirement benefit. If a claim has been accepted on an aggravation basis and the employee is eligible for social security benefits, the organization’s offset must be proportionally calculated. An overpayment must be recouped in the same manner as set forth in section 65-05-09.1. This section applies to an employee who becomes entitled to and receives social security retirement benefits after June 30, 1989, or who receives social security retirement benefits that have been converted from social security disability benefits by the social security administration after June 30, 1989. A conversion by the organization from offsetting an employee’s social security disability benefits to offsetting an employee’s social security retirement benefits under this section may not result in a decrease in the aggregate amount of benefits the employee receives from both sources.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 770, § 4; 1993, ch. 614, § 10; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.

65-05-09.3.
Retirement presumption — Termination of benefits upon retirement.

An employee who has retired or voluntarily withdrawn from the labor force and who, at that time, was not eligible to receive temporary total disability, temporary partial disability, or permanent total disability benefits or to receive a rehabilitation allowance from the organization is presumed retired from the labor market. The presumption may be rebutted by a preponderance of the evidence; however, the subjective statement of an employee that the employee is not retired is not sufficient in itself to rebut objective evidence of retirement.

An injured employee who begins receiving social security retirement benefits or other retirement benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits or who attains retirement age for social security retirement benefits, unless the employee proves the employee is not eligible to receive social security retirement benefits or other benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits, is considered retired. The organization may not pay any disability benefits, rehabilitation benefits, or supplementary benefits to an employee who is considered retired; however, the employee remains eligible for medical benefits, permanent partial impairment benefits, and the additional benefit payable under section 65-05-09.4.

The organization retains liability for disability benefits, rehabilitation benefits, permanent partial impairment benefits, and medical benefits for an injured employee who is receiving social security retirement benefits or other retirement benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits or who attains retirement age for social security retirement benefits, unless the employee is not eligible to receive social security retirement benefits or other benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits, and who is gainfully employed and who suffers an injury arising out of and in the course of that employment. The organization may not pay disability or rehabilitation benefits under this subsection for more than three years, subject to section 65-05-09.2, for injuries occurring after August 1, 1997.

If an employee is injured within the two years preceding the employee’s presumed retirement date, the organization shall pay disability benefits, rehabilitation benefits, or a combination of both benefits for no more than two years. If the duration of disability benefits, rehabilitation benefits, or a combination of both benefits extends beyond the presumed retirement date, the organization shall convert the benefit to an additional benefit payable at the date the disability ends or when two years of benefits have been paid, whichever occurs first.

This section applies to an individual who begins receiving social security retirement benefits or other retirement benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits or who attains retirement age for social security retirement benefits unless the employee proves the employee is not eligible to receive social security retirement benefits or other benefits in lieu of social security retirement benefits, after July 31, 1995.

An injured employee who has received disability benefits that have been discontinued before retirement in accordance with this section is eligible to receive disability benefits after retirement if the injured employee meets the reapplication criteria under subsection 1 of section 65-05-08. Disability and rehabilitation benefits received under this subsection may not exceed three years.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 714, § 46; 1995, ch. 623, § 1; 1997, ch. 543, § 2; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2011, ch. 510, § 1; 2019, ch. 528, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.